Hawaii statutes.
[§432:1-617] Colon cancer screening
coverage. (a) All individual and group hospital and medical service
contracts providing health care coverage shall provide coverage for
colorectal-cancer screening by all A and B grade screening modalities as
recommended by the United States Preventive Services Task Force.

(b) Beginning March 1, 2011, all health
insurance providers in Hawaii shall inform their insured of the risk associated
with undiagnosed colorectal cancer and encourage the insured to consult with
the insured's physician about available screening options. [L 2010, c 157, §2]

Note

Section applies to policies, contracts, and plans of health
insurance issued or renewed after January 1, 2011. L 2010, c 157, §5.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next